Utah statutes.
17B-1-641.   Local district may expand uniform procedures -- Limitation.

(1)  Subject to Subsection (2), a local district may expand the uniform accounting, budgeting, and reporting procedure prescribed in the Uniform Accounting Manual for Local Districts prepared by the state auditor under Subsection 67-3-1(13), to better serve the needs of the district.

(2)  A local district may not deviate from or alter the basic prescribed classification systems for the identity of funds and accounts set forth in the Uniform Accounting Manual for Local Districts.

